Arkansas, session 2025, HB1291.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 11-4-203(3), concerning the definition of
"employee" as used in the Minimum Wage Act of the State of Arkansas, is
amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(T) An individual who:
(i) Has entered into a contract to play baseball at
the minor league level; and
(ii) Is compensated pursuant to the terms of a
collective bargaining agreement that expressly provides for wages and working
conditions.

*CRH052*
02-24-2025 10:15:01 CRH052

As Engrossed: H2/24/25 HB1291
/s/Wing



































02-24-2025 10:15:01 CRH052